Rhode Island, session 2025, SB866.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-12-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-12 entitled "Department
of Human Services" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-12-1. Department of human services.
(1) There is hereby established within the executive branch of state government a
department which shall be known as the department of human services. The department shall be
headed by a director of human services who shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and
consent of the senate and who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.
(2) The director shall carry out all of the provisions of all of the general and public laws
heretofore carried out by the department of education and the director of social welfare with relation
to:
(a) Vocational rehabilitation;
(b) Division of correctional services; and
(c) Division of community services, whose several functions are by this chapter transferred
to the department of human services.
(3) The director shall carry out all department recruitment efforts and job training to attract
qualified candidates eligible for the following positions:
(a) Eligibility technician;
(b) Child service enforcement agent;

(c) Social case worker I & II;
(d) Employment career advisor;
(e) The director shall promulgate rules concerning the eligibility of persons for the job
training program; the granting of a three thousand dollar ($3,000) stipend from available funds, for
eligible applicants who have successfully completed the job training program and the department’s
probationary period.
SECTION 2. Section 42-72-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-72 entitled "Department
of Children, Youth and Families" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-72-4. Qualifications and duties of director.
(a) The director shall meet the following minimum qualifications:
(1) Hold a master’s degree in social work or a closely related field, and have demonstrated
experience in child welfare and/or children’s mental health, and/or juvenile justice; and
(2) Have at least five (5) years of increasing responsibility in administering programs for
children.
(b) The director’s duties include, but are not limited to:
(1) Administration and direction of the operation of the department;
(2) Examination of programs, services, and plans for children for the purpose of identifying
duplications, inefficiencies, effectiveness of programs, resources and unmet needs;
(3) Securing and analysis of departmental plans and budget requests affecting children’s
programs and services;
(4) Review of federal funds utilized and available to the state for children’s programs and
services;
(5) Collation of items in the governor’s budget related to programs and services for children
and issuance of impact statements;
(6) Formulation of recommendations to the governor and other appropriate department
heads on planning and expenditures for children’s programs and services;
(7) Liaison with community child advocacy groups, including parents, to receive advice on
resources, needs, and priorities in the different localities;
(8) Provide effective public information on children’s services in Rhode Island;
(9) Advise the legislature on the needs of children and their families;
(10) Establish a central registry for the purpose of reporting, collating, receiving, and
administering reports involving children;
(11) Liaison with other state departments, agencies, local governments, and private
providers of services to coordinate services and maximize resources in developing programs;
LC002558 - Page 2 of 4

(12) Formulation of rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this
chapter;
(13) Preparation of an annual report and state plan to be sent to the governor and the general
assembly;
(14) Provision or arrangement for the provision of suitable treatment, rehabilitation, and
care for each child under the director’s supervision by pursuing the least restrictive placement and,
wherever feasible, by effectuating community placements in Rhode Island;
(15) The director shall provide for a case management information system that includes
data regarding, but not limited to, client entry, screening, client’s needs assessment, development
of a client service plan, services provision, evaluation, review and monitoring of client progress,
and client exit from the system. In addition, the director shall establish a centralized case
management unit to receive all service plans and using any additional expertise as may be required,
will review, monitor, evaluate, endorse, and/or modify as may be appropriate, each client service
plan;
(16) Administer in a coordinated and integrated manner all institutions and facilities that
are or may come under the jurisdiction of the department; and
(17) Develop a comprehensive program for the prevention of problems of children and
provide a flexible, innovative, and effective program for the placement, care, and treatment of
children committed by any court to the department, transferred to the department by other
departments, or voluntarily admitted to the department.
(18) The director shall carry out all department recruitment efforts and job training to attract
qualified candidates eligible for the following positions:
(i) Social case worker I;
(ii) Child protective investigator;
(iii) The director shall promulgate rules concerning the eligibility of persons for the job
training program; the granting of a three thousand dollar ($3,000) stipend from available funds, for
eligible applicants who have successfully completed the job training program and the department’s
probationary period.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002558
========
LC002558 - Page 3 of 4